District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.01b

Limitations.

Educational and meritorious good time credits shall not reduce the minimum sentence of any inmate convicted of a crime of violence as defined by § 22-4501, by more than 15%.

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 3b
as added Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 802(c), 41 DCR 2608
1981 Ed., § 24-429.2.
For temporary addition of section, see § 802(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 402(a) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 402(a) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).